Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-6403
State building code; adopted; amendments.

(1) There is hereby created the state building code. The Legislature hereby adopts by reference:

(a) The International Building Code (IBC), 2018 edition, except section 101.4.3 and chapter 29, published by the International Code Council, except that (i) section 305.2.3 applies to a facility having twelve or fewer children and (ii) section 310.4.1 applies to a care facility for twelve or fewer persons;

(b) The International Residential Code (IRC), 2018 edition, except section R313 and chapters 25 through 33, published by the International Code Council;

(c) The International Existing Building Code, 2018 edition, except section 809, published by the International Code Council; and

(d) The Uniform Plumbing Code, 2018 edition, designated by the American National Standards Institute as an American National Standard.

(2) The codes adopted by reference in subsection (1) of this section and the minimum standards for radon resistant new construction adopted under section 76-3504 shall constitute the state building code except as amended pursuant to the Building Construction Act or as otherwise authorized by state law.

Laws 1987, LB 227, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 319, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1304, § 4;

Laws 2003, LB 643, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB799, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB546, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB540, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB590, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB130, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB348, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB405, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB131, § 21.